test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_A_nika_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     nika: nika
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1nika: ninika
     +Px2nika: ginika
     +Px3nika: onika
     +PxIndefnika: inika
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     nika+Con: nikaenh
     nika+Dim: nikaens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     nika+Pos: nikaim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     nika+Pej: nikaish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     nika+Pos1Pl: nikainaan
     nika+PosObv: nikaini
     nika+PosPl: nikaiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     nika+Pret: nikaiban
     nika+VocPl: nika***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     nika+Loc: nikaing
     nika+Obv: nikaan
     nika+Pl: nikaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1nika+Con: ninikaenh
     +Px1nika+Dim: ninikaens
     +Px2nika+Con: ginikaenh
     +Px2nika+Dim: ginikaens
     +Px3nika+Con: onikaenh
     +Px3nika+Dim: onikaens
     +PxIndefnika+Con: inikaenh
     +PxIndefnika+Dim: inikaens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1nika+Pos: ninikaim
     +Px2nika+Pos: ginikaim
     +Px3nika+Pos: onikaim
     +PxIndefnika+Pos: inikaim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1nika+Pej: ninikaish
     +Px2nika+Pej: ginikaish
     +Px3nika+Pej: onikaish
     +PxIndefnika+Pej: inikaish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl: ninikainaan
     +Px1nika+PosObv: ninikaini
     +Px1nika+PosPl: ninikaiwaa
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl: ginikainaan
     +Px2nika+PosObv: ginikaini
     +Px2nika+PosPl: ginikaiwaa
     +Px3nika+Pos1Pl: onikainaan
     +Px3nika+PosObv: onikaini
     +Px3nika+PosPl: onikaiwaa
     +PxIndefnika+Pos1Pl: inikainaan
     +PxIndefnika+PosObv: inikaini
     +PxIndefnika+PosPl: inikaiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1nika+Pret: ninikaiban
     +Px1nika+VocPl: ninika***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Pret: ginikaiban
     +Px2nika+VocPl: ginika***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Pret: onikaiban
     +Px3nika+VocPl: onika***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Pret: inikaiban
     +PxIndefnika+VocPl: inika***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1nika+Loc: ninikaing
     +Px1nika+Obv: ninikaan
     +Px1nika+Pl: ninikaag
     +Px2nika+Loc: ginikaing
     +Px2nika+Obv: ginikaan
     +Px2nika+Pl: ginikaag
     +Px3nika+Loc: onikaing
     +Px3nika+Obv: onikaan
     +Px3nika+Pl: onikaag
     +PxIndefnika+Loc: inikaing
     +PxIndefnika+Obv: inikaan
     +PxIndefnika+Pl: inikaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     nika+Con+Pos: nikaenhim
     nika+Dim+Pos: nikaensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     nika+Con+Pej: nikaenhish
     nika+Dim+Pej: nikaensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     nika+Con+Pos1Pl: nikaenhinaan
     nika+Con+PosObv: nikaenhini
     nika+Con+PosPl: nikaenhiwaa
     nika+Dim+Pos1Pl: nikaensinaan
     nika+Dim+PosObv: nikaensini
     nika+Dim+PosPl: nikaensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     nika+Con+Pret: nikaenhiban
     nika+Con+VocPl: nikaenh***idig, idog***
     nika+Dim+Pret: nikaensiban
     nika+Dim+VocPl: nikaens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     nika+Con+Loc: nikaenhing
     nika+Con+Obv: nikaenhan
     nika+Con+Pl: nikaenhag
     nika+Dim+Loc: nikaensing
     nika+Dim+Obv: nikaensan
     nika+Dim+Pl: nikaensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     nika+Pos+Pej: nikaimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     nika+Pos+Pos1Pl: nikaiminaan
     nika+Pos+PosObv: nikaimini
     nika+Pos+PosPl: nikaimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     nika+Pos+Pret: nikaimiban
     nika+Pos+VocPl: nikaim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     nika+Pos+Loc: nikaiming
     nika+Pos+Obv: nikaiman
     nika+Pos+Pl: nikaimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     nika+Pej+Pos1Pl: nikaishinaan
     nika+Pej+PosObv: nikaishini
     nika+Pej+PosPl: nikaishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     nika+Pej+Pret: nikaishiban
     nika+Pej+VocPl: nikaish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     nika+Pej+Loc: nikaishing
     nika+Pej+Obv: nikaishan
     nika+Pej+Pl: nikaishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     nika+Pos1Pl+Pret: nikainaaniban
     nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nikainaan***idig, idog***
     nika+PosObv+Pret: nikainiiban
     nika+PosObv+VocPl: nikaini***idig, idog***
     nika+PosPl+Pret: nikaiwaaiban
     nika+PosPl+VocPl: nikaiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     nika+Pos1Pl+Loc: nikainaaning
     nika+Pos1Pl+Obv: nikainaanan
     nika+Pos1Pl+Pl: nikainaanag
     nika+PosObv+Loc: nikainiing
     nika+PosObv+Obv: nikainian
     nika+PosObv+Pl: nikainiag
     nika+PosPl+Loc: nikaiwaaing
     nika+PosPl+Obv: nikaiwaaan
     nika+PosPl+Pl: nikaiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     nika+Pret+Loc: nikaibaning
     nika+Pret+Obv: nikaibanan
     nika+Pret+Pl: nikaibanag
     nika+VocPl+Loc: nika***idig, idog***ing
     nika+VocPl+Obv: nika***idig, idog***an
     nika+VocPl+Pl: nika***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos: ninikaenhim
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos: ninikaensim
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos: ginikaenhim
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos: ginikaensim
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos: onikaenhim
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos: onikaensim
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos: inikaenhim
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos: inikaensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1nika+Con+Pej: ninikaenhish
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pej: ninikaensish
     +Px2nika+Con+Pej: ginikaenhish
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pej: ginikaensish
     +Px3nika+Con+Pej: onikaenhish
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pej: onikaensish
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pej: inikaenhish
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pej: inikaensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1nika+Con+Pos1Pl: ninikaenhinaan
     +Px1nika+Con+PosObv: ninikaenhini
     +Px1nika+Con+PosPl: ninikaenhiwaa
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pos1Pl: ninikaensinaan
     +Px1nika+Dim+PosObv: ninikaensini
     +Px1nika+Dim+PosPl: ninikaensiwaa
     +Px2nika+Con+Pos1Pl: ginikaenhinaan
     +Px2nika+Con+PosObv: ginikaenhini
     +Px2nika+Con+PosPl: ginikaenhiwaa
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pos1Pl: ginikaensinaan
     +Px2nika+Dim+PosObv: ginikaensini
     +Px2nika+Dim+PosPl: ginikaensiwaa
     +Px3nika+Con+Pos1Pl: onikaenhinaan
     +Px3nika+Con+PosObv: onikaenhini
     +Px3nika+Con+PosPl: onikaenhiwaa
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pos1Pl: onikaensinaan
     +Px3nika+Dim+PosObv: onikaensini
     +Px3nika+Dim+PosPl: onikaensiwaa
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pos1Pl: inikaenhinaan
     +PxIndefnika+Con+PosObv: inikaenhini
     +PxIndefnika+Con+PosPl: inikaenhiwaa
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pos1Pl: inikaensinaan
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+PosObv: inikaensini
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+PosPl: inikaensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1nika+Con+Pret: ninikaenhiban
     +Px1nika+Con+VocPl: ninikaenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pret: ninikaensiban
     +Px1nika+Dim+VocPl: ninikaens***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Con+Pret: ginikaenhiban
     +Px2nika+Con+VocPl: ginikaenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pret: ginikaensiban
     +Px2nika+Dim+VocPl: ginikaens***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Con+Pret: onikaenhiban
     +Px3nika+Con+VocPl: onikaenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pret: onikaensiban
     +Px3nika+Dim+VocPl: onikaens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pret: inikaenhiban
     +PxIndefnika+Con+VocPl: inikaenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pret: inikaensiban
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+VocPl: inikaens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1nika+Con+Loc: ninikaenhing
     +Px1nika+Con+Obv: ninikaenhan
     +Px1nika+Con+Pl: ninikaenhag
     +Px1nika+Dim+Loc: ninikaensing
     +Px1nika+Dim+Obv: ninikaensan
     +Px1nika+Dim+Pl: ninikaensag
     +Px2nika+Con+Loc: ginikaenhing
     +Px2nika+Con+Obv: ginikaenhan
     +Px2nika+Con+Pl: ginikaenhag
     +Px2nika+Dim+Loc: ginikaensing
     +Px2nika+Dim+Obv: ginikaensan
     +Px2nika+Dim+Pl: ginikaensag
     +Px3nika+Con+Loc: onikaenhing
     +Px3nika+Con+Obv: onikaenhan
     +Px3nika+Con+Pl: onikaenhag
     +Px3nika+Dim+Loc: onikaensing
     +Px3nika+Dim+Obv: onikaensan
     +Px3nika+Dim+Pl: onikaensag
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Loc: inikaenhing
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Obv: inikaenhan
     +PxIndefnika+Con+Pl: inikaenhag
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Loc: inikaensing
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Obv: inikaensan
     +PxIndefnika+Dim+Pl: inikaensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1nika+Pos+Pej: ninikaimish
     +Px2nika+Pos+Pej: ginikaimish
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pej: onikaimish
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+Pej: inikaimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1nika+Pos+Pos1Pl: ninikaiminaan
     +Px1nika+Pos+PosObv: ninikaimini
     +Px1nika+Pos+PosPl: ninikaimiwaa
     +Px2nika+Pos+Pos1Pl: ginikaiminaan
     +Px2nika+Pos+PosObv: ginikaimini
     +Px2nika+Pos+PosPl: ginikaimiwaa
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pos1Pl: onikaiminaan
     +Px3nika+Pos+PosObv: onikaimini
     +Px3nika+Pos+PosPl: onikaimiwaa
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+Pos1Pl: inikaiminaan
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+PosObv: inikaimini
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+PosPl: inikaimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1nika+Pos+Pret: ninikaimiban
     +Px1nika+Pos+VocPl: ninikaim***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Pos+Pret: ginikaimiban
     +Px2nika+Pos+VocPl: ginikaim***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pret: onikaimiban
     +Px3nika+Pos+VocPl: onikaim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+Pret: inikaimiban
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+VocPl: inikaim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1nika+Pos+Loc: ninikaiming
     +Px1nika+Pos+Obv: ninikaiman
     +Px1nika+Pos+Pl: ninikaimag
     +Px2nika+Pos+Loc: ginikaiming
     +Px2nika+Pos+Obv: ginikaiman
     +Px2nika+Pos+Pl: ginikaimag
     +Px3nika+Pos+Loc: onikaiming
     +Px3nika+Pos+Obv: onikaiman
     +Px3nika+Pos+Pl: onikaimag
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+Loc: inikaiming
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+Obv: inikaiman
     +PxIndefnika+Pos+Pl: inikaimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pos1Pl: ninikaishinaan
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosObv: ninikaishini
     +Px1nika+Pej+PosPl: ninikaishiwaa
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pos1Pl: ginikaishinaan
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosObv: ginikaishini
     +Px2nika+Pej+PosPl: ginikaishiwaa
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pos1Pl: onikaishinaan
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosObv: onikaishini
     +Px3nika+Pej+PosPl: onikaishiwaa
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+Pos1Pl: inikaishinaan
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosObv: inikaishini
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+PosPl: inikaishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pret: ninikaishiban
     +Px1nika+Pej+VocPl: ninikaish***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pret: ginikaishiban
     +Px2nika+Pej+VocPl: ginikaish***idig, idog***
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pret: onikaishiban
     +Px3nika+Pej+VocPl: onikaish***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+Pret: inikaishiban
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+VocPl: inikaish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1nika+Pej+Loc: ninikaishing
     +Px1nika+Pej+Obv: ninikaishan
     +Px1nika+Pej+Pl: ninikaishag
     +Px2nika+Pej+Loc: ginikaishing
     +Px2nika+Pej+Obv: ginikaishan
     +Px2nika+Pej+Pl: ginikaishag
     +Px3nika+Pej+Loc: onikaishing
     +Px3nika+Pej+Obv: onikaishan
     +Px3nika+Pej+Pl: onikaishag
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+Loc: inikaishing
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+Obv: inikaishan
     +PxIndefnika+Pej+Pl: inikaishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+Pret: ninikainaaniban
     +Px1nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ninikainaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+PosObv+Pret: ninikainiiban
     +Px1nika+PosObv+VocPl: ninikaini***idig, idog***
     +Px1nika+PosPl+Pret: ninikaiwaaiban
     +Px1nika+PosPl+VocPl: ninikaiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+Pret: ginikainaaniban
     +Px2nika+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ginikainaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2nika+PosObv+Pret: ginikainiiban
